Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-320 Assessments. (a) As soon
as practicable but not more than two years from the date of an order of
liquidation under section 431:15-307 of an insurer issuing assessable policies,
the liquidator shall make a report to the court setting forth:

(1) The reasonable value of the assets of the
insurer;

(2) The insurer's probable total liabilities;

(3) The probable aggregate amount of the assessment
necessary to pay all claims of creditors and expenses in full, including
expenses of administration and costs of collecting the assessment; and

(4) A recommendation as to whether or not an
assessment should be made and in what amount.

(b)(1) Upon the basis of the report provided in
subsection (a), including any supplements and amendments thereto, the circuit
court of the first judicial circuit may levy one or more assessments against
all members of the insurer who are subject to assessment.

(2) Subject to any applicable legal limits on
assessability, the aggregate assessment shall be for the amount that the sum of
the probable liabilities, the expenses of administration, and the estimated
cost of collection of the assessment, exceeds the value of existing assets,
with due regard being given to assessments that cannot be collected
economically.

(c) After levy of assessment under subsection
(b) the liquidator shall issue an order directing each member who has not paid
the assessment pursuant to the order, to show cause why the liquidator should
not pursue a judgment therefor.

(d) The liquidator shall give notice of the
order to show cause by publication and by first class mail to each member
liable thereunder, mailed to each member's last known address as it appears on
the insurer's records, at least twenty days before the return day of the order
to show cause.

(e)(1) If a member does not appear and serve duly
verified objections upon the liquidator on or before the return day of the
order to show cause under subsection (c), the court shall make an order
adjudging the member liable for the amount of the assessment against the
member, pursuant to subsection (c), together with costs, and the liquidator
shall have a judgment against the member therefor.

(2) If on or before such return day, the member
appears and serves duly verified objections upon the liquidator, the
commissioner may hear and determine the matter or may appoint a referee to hear
it and make such order as the facts warrant. In the event that the
commissioner determines that such objections do not warrant relief from
assessment, the member may request the court to review the matter and vacate
the order to show cause.

(f) The liquidator may enforce any order or
collect any judgment under subsection (e) by any lawful means. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next